Tennessee, session 114, HB0537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Law Enforcement's Safer
Tennessee Electronic Registration (LESTER) Act".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-138, is amended by deleting the
following language:
If a person displays the evidence in an electronic format pursuant to this section, the
person is not consenting for law enforcement to access any other contents of the
electronic device.
and substituting instead the following:
If a person displays the evidence in an electronic format pursuant to this section, then
the evidence must be accepted by law enforcement as proof of registration, and such
display is not consent for law enforcement to access any other contents of the electronic
device.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-312(a), is amended by
deleting the language "motor-propelled vehicle" and "motor propelled vehicle" wherever it
appears and substituting instead the language "motor vehicle".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0537
000575
- 1 -